District of Columbia statutes.
28:2A-515

Acceptance of goods.

(a)

Acceptance of goods occurs after the lessee has had a reasonable opportunity to inspect the goods, and

(1)

The lessee signifies or acts with respect to the goods in a manner that signifies to the lessor or the supplier that the goods are conforming or that the lessee will take or retain them in spite of their nonconformity; or

(2)

The lessee fails to make an effective rejection of the goods (§ 28:2A-509(b)).

(b)

Acceptance of a part of any commercial unit is acceptance of that entire unit.

July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-128, § 2(b), 39 DCR 3830
1981 Ed., § 28:2A-515.

“Supplier”. Section 2A-103(1)(x).

“Lessor”. Section 2A-103(1)(p).

“Lessee”. Section 2A-103(1)(n).

“Goods”. Section 2A-103(1)(h).

“Conforming”. Section 2A-103(1)(d).

Definitional Cross References: “Commercial unit”. Section 2A-103(1)(c).

Cross References:Sections 2-606(1)(a) and 2-606(1)(c).

Changes: The provisions of Section 2-606(1)(a) were substantially rewritten to provide that the lessee’s conduct may signify acceptance. Further, the provisions of Section 2-606(1)(c) were not incorporated as irrelevant given the lessee’s possession and use of the leased goods.

Uniform Statutory Source:Section 2-606.